District of Columbia statutes.
11-1721

Clerks of courts.

The District of Columbia Court of Appeals and the Superior Court shall each have a clerk who shall perform such duties as may be assigned to the clerk.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 510, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111
June 13, 1994, Pub. L. 103-266, § 1(b)(84), 108 Stat. 713
1981 Ed., § 11-1721.
1973 Ed., § 11-1721.